District of Columbia statutes.
46-415

Repealed

Issue of marriages of colored persons.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1394, ch. 854, § 1297
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 11, 51 DCR 881
1981 Ed., § 30-115.
1973 Ed., § 30-117.